Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 1
FREEWAYS AND LOCAL SERVICE ROADS

43-3-101. Freeways - how declared - commercial enterprises prohibited.

The transportation commission with the approval of the governor may designate any portion of a highway to be a freeway whenever, in its opinion, by reason of the volume and speed of traffic there is particular danger to the safety of the traveling public by collisions between vehicles proceeding in opposite directions thereon or between vehicles at intersections of said state highways with other public highways or at approaches to said state highways from private property abutting thereon.

Whenever, in the establishment of a freeway, real property held under one ownership is severed by the freeway, then the chief engineer may provide access across the freeway from one such tract to the other either at grade or below or above grade at least once within one mile if there is a demand made for such crossing by the landowner, or he must compensate such landowner for any legally compensable damages sustained by any such severance as provided by law, but the compensable damage shall in no case be less than the difference in value caused by the severance. No such connecting roads shall be used for or in connection with the conduct of any roadside business or enterprise. If such tracts at any time cease to be held under one ownership, the chief engineer may terminate and discontinue such access roads.

Except as provided in section 32-9-119.8, C.R.S., and part 15 of article 1 of this title, no commercial enterprise or activity for serving motorists, other than emergency services for disabled vehicles, shall be conducted or authorized on any property designated as or acquired for or in connection with a freeway or highway by the department of transportation, or any other governmental agency. At locations deemed appropriate by the transportation commission, the department of transportation shall construct local service roads, which open into or connect with a freeway, in such manner as to facilitate the establishment and operation of competitive commercial enterprises for serving users of the freeway on private property abutting such local service roads.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 654, § 1.

CSA:

C. 143, § 144.

L. 43:

p. 531, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-6-1.

L. 57:

p. 634, §§ 1-3.

L. 63:

p. 794, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-6-1.

L. 91:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1111, § 158, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 343, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 264, § 6, effective April 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act amending this subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 1999.

43-3-102. Engineer to divide freeway.

After such state highway or a portion of a state highway has been designated a freeway under section 43-3-101, the chief engineer is authorized to divide and separate such freeway into separate roadways by the construction of raised curbings, central dividing sections, or other physical separations or by designating such separate roadways by signs, markers, stripes, or other devices and may direct the course of traffic thereon and the proper lane for such traffic by appropriate signs, markers, stripes, or other devices.

No private right of access shall accrue to property abutting any freeway established on a new location except at such points as may be authorized; but nothing in this section shall authorize or permit the acquisition of any existing property rights except upon payment of just compensation as provided by law.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 655, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 145.

CRS 53:

§ 120-6-2.

L. 63:

p. 795, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-6-2.

43-3-103. Engineer may close street or road.

The chief engineer, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to enter into agreements with the cities or towns having jurisdiction over city or town streets, or with the counties having jurisdiction over county highways, or with other authorities having jurisdiction over other public ways to close any city street or county highway or other public way at or near the point of its intersection with any such freeway or to make provisions for carrying such city street or county highway or other public way over or under or to a connection with the freeway and do any work on such city street or county highway or other public way as is necessary therefor.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 655, § 3.

CSA:

C. 143, § 146.

CRS 53:

§ 120-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-6-3.

43-3-104. Street not to open into freeway.

No city street, county highway, or other public way of any kind shall be opened into or connected with any such freeway unless the chief engineer, with the approval of the governor, consents in writing to the same. The chief engineer, with the approval of the governor, may fix the terms and conditions on which such connection shall be made if such connection will best serve the public interest, safety, and welfare and may withhold his consent to such connection if such connection will not serve the public interest, safety, and welfare. Appeal from any ruling or decision made under the provisions of this section may be had to the district court of the county in which that portion of the freeway affected is located.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 655, § 4.

CSA:

C. 143, § 147.

CRS 53:

§ 120-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-6-4.

43-3-105. When local service roads laid out.

Whenever a freeway is designated under the provisions of this part 1, the chief engineer is authorized to lay out and construct local service roads or designate as local service roads any existing street or public way if the same is within reasonable distance of such freeway wherever, in his opinion, there is a particular danger to the traveling public of collisions due to vehicles entering the freeway from the sides thereof and may divide and separate any such service road from the freeway by raised curbs or dividing sections, or other appropriate devices. If such local service road is a highway or street already in existence, he may designate the same by appropriate signs, markers, or other devices.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 655, § 5.

CSA:

C. 143, § 148.

CRS 53:

§ 120-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-6-5.

43-3-106. Acquiring land and right-of-way.

The department of transportation is authorized to purchase or condemn any land necessary for the construction of any local service road authorized by this part 1 and is also authorized to purchase or condemn any right of access appertaining to any land abutting on a state highway or on a portion of a state highway when such right of access is disturbed or destroyed by the designation of a state highway or such portion of a state highway as a freeway under the provisions of this part 1 in the same manner and form as provided by law for the purchase or condemnation of highway rights-of-way.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 656, § 10.

CSA:

C. 143, § 153.

CRS 53:

§ 120-6-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-6-10.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1111, § 159, effective July 1.

43-3-107. Acquisition by commissioners and department of transportation jointly.

Boards of county commissioners of the several counties may join with the department of transportation to acquire by donation, purchase, or condemnation any land or right of access appurtenant thereto necessary for the construction of any state highway, freeway, or local service road.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 735, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-6-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-6-11.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1112, § 160, effective July 1.